Oregon, session 2025S1, HB3992.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, for the purposes for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate
funds, is decreased by $800,000.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (12), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for finance and budget, is increased by $2,429,666, for
implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session) (Enrolled House Bill 3991).
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (11), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for Department of Transportation administrative ser-
vices, is increased by $1,150,063, for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (special
session) (Enrolled House Bill 3991).
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for commerce and compliance, is increased by
$3,746,382, for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session) (Enrolled
House Bill 3991).
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (10), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 3992 (HB 3992-INTRO) Page 1

ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for public transportation, is increased by $196,600,000,
for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session) (Enrolled House Bill
3991).
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (9), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for policy, data and analysis, is increased by $252,725,
for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session) (Enrolled House Bill
3991).
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for project delivery and support, is increased by
$191,889, for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session) (Enrolled
House Bill 3991.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the Audits Division, is increased
by $479,446, for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session) (Enrolled
House Bill 3991).
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Legislative Policy and Research Committee, for the biennium ending June 30,
2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $300,000, for implementation of chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (special session) (Enrolled House Bill 3991).
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June
30, 2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, to undertake a review of the
methodology for the highway cost allocation study as required by chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (special session) (Enrolled House Bill 3991).
SECTION 11. This 2025 special session Act being necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2025
special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3992 (HB 3992-INTRO) Page 2

Passed by House September 1, 2025 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate September 29, 2025
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3992 (HB 3992-INTRO) Page 3